zza/zza-Latn.aff
SFX I Y 69
SFX I 0 a [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX I 0 î [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX I 0 e [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX I 0 êne [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX I 0 ê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX I 0 o [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX I 0 ya [aeêiîouû] .
SFX I 0 yî [aeêiîouû] .
SFX I 0 ye [aeêiîouû] .
SFX I 0 yêne [aeêiîouû] .
SFX I 0 yê [aeêiîouû] .
SFX I 0 yo [aeêiîouû] .
SFX I 0 bîya [^b] .
SFX I 0 bîyî [^b] .
SFX I 0 bîye [^b] .
SFX I 0 bî [^b] .
SFX I 0 bîyê [^b] .
SFX I 0 bîyo [^b] .
SFX I 0 ibîya [b] .
SFX I 0 ibîyî [b] .
SFX I 0 ibîye [b] .
SFX I 0 ibî [b] .
SFX I 0 ibîyê [b] .
SFX I 0 ibîyo [b] .
SFX I 0 yo a$
SFX I 0 ya a$
SFX I 0 ye a$
SFX I 0 yê a$
SFX I 0 ne a$
SFX I 0 bî .
SFX I 0 bi .
SFX I 0 yî a$
SFX I 0 me a$
SFX I 0 yû a$
SFX I 0 yi a$
SFX I 0 vî .
SFX I 0 bo .
SFX I 0 bê a$
SFX I 0 mî a$
SFX I 0 bîy .
SFX I 0 ybî a$
SFX I 0 yên a$
SFX I 0 ynî a$
SFX I 0 ynê a$
SFX I 0 yêr e$
SFX I 0 yne a$
SFX I 0 yêne a$
SFX I 0 bîya .
SFX I 0 yênê a$
SFX I 0 yîme a$
SFX I 0 yaye a$
SFX I 0 bîyî .
SFX I 0 yayo a$
SFX I 0 yayê a$
SFX I 0 bîme .
SFX I 0 bîye .
SFX I 0 yayi a$
SFX I 0 yayî a$
SFX I 0 yebî a$
SFX I 0 yemê a$
SFX I 0 yêbî a$
SFX I 0 yînê a$
SFX I 0 yîşa a$
SFX I 0 yîşê a$
SFX I 0 yûnê a$
SFX I 0 yûnî a$
SFX I 0 yayîş a$
SFX I 0 yayiş a$
SFX I i î i$


PFX T Y 179
PFX T 0 nê . 
PFX T 0 bi . 
PFX T 0 a [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 nê [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 pê [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 ni [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 de [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 nî [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 ra [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 ci [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 pa [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 we [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 ro [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 ca [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 pe [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 se [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 ve [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 şe [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 bi [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 ya [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 anê [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 to [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 bar [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 doz [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 fam [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 nêa [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 nîa [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 pey [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 çap [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 bese [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 hes [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 arê [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 ef [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 es [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 me [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 nas [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 pênê [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 qut [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 rêz [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 sûr [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 utî [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 cam [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 cax [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 dên [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 hal [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 kay [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 kê [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 la [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 mor [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 ne [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 neşr [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 nîye [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 pak [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 pan [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 qat [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 qir [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 qul [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 qum [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 ranê [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 ray [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 ref [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 sur [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 sîm [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 wenê [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 çe [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 çît [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 çima [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 feka [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 hîs [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 qeyd [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 nîyê [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 vîn [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 belî [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 dua [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 fûm [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 kaş [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 qal [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 saz [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 are [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 belû [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 dard [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 hel [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 kar [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 lone [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 maç [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 nêma [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 plan [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 qule [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 sera [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 xêz [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 şaş [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 awan [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 belu [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 boy [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 buya [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 bî [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 celb [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 defn [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 deni [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 denê [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 dera [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 efû [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 far [^aeêiîouû] .
PFX T 0 anê .
PFX T 0 danê .
PFX T 0 denê .
PFX T 0 panê .
PFX T 0 ponê .
PFX T 0 ranê .
PFX T 0 ronê .
PFX T 0 tanê .
PFX T 0 tonê .
PFX T 0 wenê .
PFX T 0 pênê .
PFX T 0 nêa .
PFX T 0 nêda .
PFX T 0 nêde .
PFX T 0 nêpa .
PFX T 0 nêpo .
PFX T 0 nêra .
PFX T 0 nêro .
PFX T 0 nêta .
PFX T 0 nêto .
PFX T 0 nêwe .
PFX T 0 nêpê .
PFX T 0 a .
PFX T 0 da .
PFX T 0 de .
PFX T 0 pa .
PFX T 0 po .
PFX T 0 ra .
PFX T 0 ro .
PFX T 0 ta .
PFX T 0 to .
PFX T 0 we .
PFX T 0 mea .
PFX T 0 meda .
PFX T 0 mede .
PFX T 0 mepa .
PFX T 0 mepo .
PFX T 0 mera .
PFX T 0 mero .
PFX T 0 meta .
PFX T 0 meto .
PFX T 0 mewe .
PFX T 0 mepê .
PFX T 0 ame .
PFX T 0 dame .
PFX T 0 deme .
PFX T 0 pame .
PFX T 0 pome .
PFX T 0 rame .
PFX T 0 rome .
PFX T 0 tame .
PFX T 0 tome .
PFX T 0 weme .
PFX T 0 pême .
PFX T 0 bia .
PFX T 0 bida .
PFX T 0 bide .
PFX T 0 bipa .
PFX T 0 bipo .
PFX T 0 bira .
PFX T 0 biro .
PFX T 0 bita .
PFX T 0 bito .
PFX T 0 biwe .
PFX T 0 bipê .
PFX T 0 abi .
PFX T 0 dabi .
PFX T 0 debi .
PFX T 0 pabi .
PFX T 0 pobi .
PFX T 0 rabi .
PFX T 0 robi .
PFX T 0 tabi .
PFX T 0 tobi .
PFX T 0 webi .
PFX T 0 pêbi .


SFX T Y 109
SFX T 0 e [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 î [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 êne [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 o [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 a [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 ê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 ye [aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 yî [aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 yêne [aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 yo [aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 ya [aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 yê [aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 bîyo [^b] .
SFX T 0 bîya [^b] .
SFX T 0 bîyê [^b] .
SFX T 0 bî [^b] .
SFX T 0 bîy [^b] .
SFX T 0 ibîyo [b] .
SFX T 0 ibîya [b] .
SFX T 0 ibîyê [b] .
SFX T 0 ibî [b] .
SFX T 0 ibîy [b] .
SFX T 0 i [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 û [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 u [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 iş [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 ên [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 bi [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 bî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 în [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 îy [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 ox [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 en [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 nî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 ib [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 in [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 me [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 be [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 ey [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 vî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 îv [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 er [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 nê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 îb [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 îm [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 îş [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 ûn [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 ene [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 inî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 îbî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 ibi [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 ibî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 ênî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 enî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 ênê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 îme [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 înî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 êni [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 işê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 enê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 inê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 îvî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 ena [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 işî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 ebî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 ine [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 bîy [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 ûne [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 oxê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 ibe [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 oxî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 eni [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 îni [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 ane [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 aye [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 eyê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 eyî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 ivî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 îbi [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 ere [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 ime [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 une [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 éne [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 êbi [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 êbî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 îbê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 îne [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 înê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 îyen [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 ibîy [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 îbîy [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 îyên [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 bîya [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 enan [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 işan [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 biya [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 bîyo [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 bîyî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 iney [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 oxan [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 îyenî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 işanê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 îyeni [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 ibîya [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 enanê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 eyanê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 ibîyê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 ibîyî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX T 0 işîya [^aeêiîouû] .
