zza/zza-Latn.dic
agêra/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:agêrayene
aleqna/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:aleqnayene
anişt/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:aniştene
ard/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:ardene
aspawîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:aspawîyayene
açarna/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:açarnayene
bereqna/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:bereqnayene
berma/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:bermayene
bî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:bîyene
caverda/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:caverdayene
ceniqna/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:ceniqnayene
cigirîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:cigirîyayene
darîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:darîyayene
degirosna/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:degirosnayene
dirîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:dirîyayene
dot/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:dotene
ewnîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:ewnîyayene
eşkawit/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:eşkawitene
fetesîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:fetesîyayene
geyra/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:geyrayene
girewt/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:girewtene
gurra/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:gurrayene
helisîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:helisîyayene
heredna/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:herednayene
hesîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:hesîyayene
hûmarit/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:hûmaritene
jîva/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:jîvayene
kişîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:kişîyayene
kot/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:kotene
lenga/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:lengayene
masna/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:masnayene
mend/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:mendene
miradîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:miradîyayene
na/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:nayene
nepixîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:nepixîyayene
nimit/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:nimitene
pajîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:pajîyayene
parsa/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:persayene
pilozna/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:pilozîyayene
pindosna/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:piloznayene
pînît/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:pînîtene
qelibna/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:qelibnayene
qelibîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:qelibîyayene
qîja/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:qîjayene
rafîna/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:rafînayene
recifîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:recifîyayene
rijna/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:rijnayene
rûçikna/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:rûçiknayene
tada/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:tadayene
tengizîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:tengizîyayene
terkit/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:terkitene
têşana/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:têşanayene
vara/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:varayene
verişna/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:verişnayene
virazîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:virazîyayene
visna/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:visnayene
wedard/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:wedardene
wenişt/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:weniştene
weçîna/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:weçînayene
xeneqîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:xeneqîyayene
xeripna/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:xeripnayene
zirrna/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:zirrnayene
zîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:zîyayene
şahtna/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:şahtnayene
şemitîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:şemitîyayene
şikit/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active lem:şikitene
